Tennessee, session 114, HB1762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-13-108(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(14) Verify that an affidavit on a deed of conveyance of real property was duly
signed by sworn declaration under penalty of perjury, if prepared by an attorney licensed
to practice in this state or a title agent licensed in this state, or, if signed by the owner, a
notarized affidavit stating under oath the name and address of the preparer of the
document and that the preparer is an attorney licensed to practice in this state, a title
insurance agent licensed in this state, the owner of the real property being transferred,
or a person with legal authority to act on behalf of the owner of the real property being
transferred. The sworn declaration or notarized affidavit must be in substantially the
following form:
HB1762
010489
- 1 -

I hereby swear or affirm that I prepared the attached deed of conveyance and
that I am an attorney currently licensed in Tennessee (BPR #____________), a
title agent currently licensed in Tennessee (License # ______________), or an
actual owner of an interest in the property that is the subject of this deed.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
66-5-111.
(a) A deed of conveyance of real property must be prepared by an attorney
licensed to practice in this state, a title insurance agent licensed in this state, the owner
of the real property being transferred, or a person with legal authority to act on behalf of
the owner of the real property being transferred.
(b) The deed must be recorded in the county in which the property is located,
pursuant to § 66-24-103.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) Deeds filed on behalf of the federal government, state government, or
a local government, or an instrumentality of the federal government, state
government, or a local government, for property owned by such government; or
(2) Deeds of trust, mortgages, or release deeds prepared by a state or
national bank, savings bank, credit union, or federal farm credit association,
where the financial institution possesses an interest in the property that is the
subject of the property described in the deed.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-24-101, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(g) The county register shall not register any deed of conveyance of real
property that is not prepared by an attorney licensed to practice in this state, a title
- 2 - 010489

insurance agent licensed in this state, the owner of the real property being transferred,
or a person with legal authority to act on behalf of the owner of the real property being
transferred, as prescribed in § 66-5-105, and so stated on the document by a sworn
declaration under penalty of perjury, if prepared by an attorney licensed to practice in
this state or a title agent licensed in this state, or, if signed by the owner, a sworn and
notarized affidavit. A failure of the record to show a compliance with the requirements of
this subsection (g) does not affect the validity of the registration of any registered
instrument.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conveyances of real property occurring on or after that date.
- 3 - 010489